test/src/morphology/nouns-51_gt-norm.yaml
# yaml test generated from  with doccomments2yaml.awk
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst

Tests:
  Noun - Old A+N Compounds: # A+N compounds that agree
    aavameri+N+Sg+Nom: aavameri # 
    aavameri+N+Sg+Gen: aavanmeren # 
    aavameri+N+Pl+Ine: aavoissamerissä # 
    Iso-Britannia+N+Prop+Sg+Nom: Iso-Britannia # 
    Iso-Britannia+N+Prop+Sg+Gen: Ison-Britannian # 
    Iso-Britannia+N+Prop+Pl+Ine: Isoissa-Britannioissa # 
